Alaska statutes. Title 27. Mining.
Chapter 21. Alaska Surface Coal Mining Control and Reclamation Act.

Cross references. —

For state coal leases, see AS

38.05.150

.

Administrative Code. —

For surface coal mining, see 11 AAC 90.

Collateral references. —

54 Am. Jur. 2d, Mines and Minerals, § 167 et seq.

Validity and construction of statutes regulating strip mining. 86 ALR3d 27.

Mine tailings as real or personal property. 75 ALR4th 1031.

What constitutes “disposal” of tailings for purposes of owner or operator liability under § 107(a)(2) of Comprehensive Environmental Response, Compensation, and Liability Act (42 USCS § 9607(a)(2)). 136 ALR Fed. 117, § 3.